Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-308
Administrator, departments, and other appointed officers; enumerated; appointment and removal.

Each city of the first class shall have such departments and appointed officers as shall be established by ordinance passed by the city council, which shall include a city clerk, treasurer, engineer, and attorney, and such officers as may otherwise be required by law. Except as provided in the City Manager Plan of Government Act, the mayor may, with the approval of the city council, appoint the necessary officers, as well as an administrator, who shall perform such duties as prescribed by ordinance. Except as provided in the City Manager Plan of Government Act, the appointed officers may be removed at any time by the mayor with approval of a majority of the city council. The office of administrator may not be held by the mayor. The appointed administrator may concurrently hold any other appointive office provided for in this section and section 16-325.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 14, p. 233;

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 107;

R.S.1913, § 4874;

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 252;

Laws 1921, c. 164, § 1, p. 657;

C.S.1922, § 4042;

C.S.1929, § 16-304;

R.S.1943, § 16-308;

Laws 1953, c. 26, § 1, p. 110;

Laws 1961, c. 41, § 1, p. 171;

Laws 1963, c. 61, § 2, p. 254;

Laws 1974, LB 1024, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 93, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 53;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 4.

City Manager Plan of Government Act, see section 19-601.

City attorney is appointive officer and not principal officer; may be removed at any time by mayor with approval of majority of city council; and has no statutory power to make governmental decisions which affect the city. Communication Workers of America, AFL-CIO v. City of Hastings, 198 Neb. 668, 254 N.W.2d 695 (1977).